Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1002
Oaths and affirmations; power to administer.

All courts have power to administer oaths connected with any matter pending before them, either by any judge, justice, or clerk thereof or by any other person appointed for that purpose by them. Oaths and affirmations may be administered, in all cases whatsoever, by judges of the Supreme Court, judges of the Court of Appeals, judges of the district court, judges of the county court, the Clerk of the Supreme Court, clerks of the district courts, and clerks of the county courts, within their respective jurisdictions, and by clerk magistrates within their respective counties.

Laws 1879, § 36, p. 89;

R.S.1913, § 1173;

C.S.1922, § 1096;

C.S.1929, § 27-314;

R.S.1943, § 24-314;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-314;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 41.

Information may be sworn to before clerk. Sharp v. State, 61 Neb. 187, 85 N.W. 38 (1901).